Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,253
Violation; penalty.

Any person violating any provision of the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each such violation. In the case of a continuing violation, each day shall constitute a separate violation.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 18.